en: Dried lingonberries
de: Getrocknete Preiselbeeren
fr: Airelles séchées
hr: Suhe brusnice

en: Dried mangoes
de: getrocknete Mangos, gedörrte Mangos, getrocknete Mangonen, gedörrte Mangonen
es: Mangos deshidratados, Mango deshidratado
fi: kuivatut mangot
fr: Mangues séchées, Mangue séchée, Mangue déshydratée
hr: Sušeni mango
it: Manghi secchi
lt: Džiovinti mangai
nl: Gedroogde mangos
ru: Манго сушёные, сушёные манго

en: Mixed dried fruits, Dried mixed fruits
de: Getrocknete Früchtemischung, Getrocknete Früchte-Mix, Trockenfruchtmischung
es: Mezclas de frutas deshidratadas, Mezclas de frutas secas
fi: kuivatut hedelmäsekoitukset
fr: Mélanges de fruits secs
hr: Sušeno miješano voće
it: Frutta essiccata mista
lt: Džiovinti įvairūs vaisiai
nl: Gedroogde fruitmelanges
pl: Suszona mieszanka owoców

en: Mixed nuts and dried fruits, Nuts with dried fruits, Nuts and dried fruits
de: Studentenfutter
fr: Mélanges de fruits secs et de fruits à coque, Mendiants, Mélanges étudiants
nl: Noten en gedroogd fruit (gemengd), Studentenhavers

en: Mix of grains and dried fruit, Mix of nuts and dried fruit
fr: Mélange apéritif de graines et fruits séchés
hr: Mješavina žitarica i suhog voća
lt: Džiovinti vaisių ir riešutų mišiniai
pl: Mieszanka ziaren i suszonych owoców, Mieszanka orzechów i suszonych owoców

en: Mix of grains and raisins, Mix of nuts and raisins
fr: Mélange apéritif de graines et raisins secs
pl: Mieszanka ziaren i rodzynek, Mieszanka orzechów i rodzynek

en: Mix of salted grains and raisins, Mix of salted nuts and raisins
fr: Mélange apéritif de graines salées et raisins secs

en: Dried papayas
de: getrocknete Papayas, gedörrte Papayas
es: Papaya deshidratada
fr: Papaye séchée
hr: Sušene papaje
lt: Džiovintos papajos
nl: Gedroogde papayas

en: Dried peaches
de: getrocknete Pfirsiche, gedörrte Pfirsiche
es: Melocotones deshidratados, Melocotones desecados, Orejones de melocotón
fi: Kuivatut persikat
fr: Pêches séchées
hr: Suhe breskve
lt: Džiovinti persikai
nl: Gedroogde perziken
pt: Pêssegos secos
ru: Персики и нектарины сушёные, сушёные персики и нектарины, персики и нектарины сушеные, сушеные персики и нектарины, сушеные персики, персики сушеные

en: Dried pears
fr: Poires séchées

en: Dried pineapple
de: getrocknete Ananas, gedörrte Ananas, getrocknete Ananasse, gedörrte Ananasse
es: Piña deshidratada
fi: Kuivattu ananas
fr: Ananas séchés
hr: Sušeni ananas
it: Ananas secchi
lt: Džiovinti ananasai
nl: Gedroogde ananas
tr: Kuru ananas, Kurutulmuş ananas

en: Dried prunes, Dried plums, Prunes
bg: Сушени сливи
de: getrocknete Pflaumen, gedörrte Pflaumen
es: Ciruelas pasas, Ciruelas deshidratadas
fi: kuivatut luumut
fr: Pruneaux, Pruneaux secs
he: שזיפים מיובשים
hr: Suhe šljive
it: Pesche secche
lt: Džiovintos slyvos
nl: Gedroogde pruimen
ru: Чернослив сушёный, сушёный чернослив, чернослив, сливы сушёные

fr: Pruneaux d'Agen
hr: Agen suhe šljive

en: Raisins, Dried grapes
bg: Стафиди
da: Rosiner
de: Rosinen, getrocknete Trauben
es: Uvas pasas, Pasas
fi: rusinat
fr: Raisins secs
hr: Grožđice
it: Uve secche
ja: レーズン, 干しぶどう, 干しブドウ, 干し葡萄
lt: Razinos, Džiovintos vynuogės
nb: Rosiner
nl: Gedroogde rozijnen
nn: Rosiner
pl: Rodzynki, suszone winogrona
ru: Изюм, виноград сушёный, виноград сушеный, сушеный виноград, сушёный виноград
sv: Russin

en: Zante currants, Raisins of Corinth
da: Korender
de: Korinthen
es: Uvas pasas de Corinto, Pasas de Corinto
fr: Raisins secs de Corinthe
hr: Grožđice iz korinta
lt: Corinth razinos
nl: Krenten
sv: Korinter

en: Sultana raisins
da: Sultanarosiner
de: Sultaninen
es: Uvas pasas sultanas, Pasas sultanas
fi: Sulttaanirusinat
fr: Raisins secs Sultanines, Raisins Sultanines
hr: Sultana grožđice
it: Uvetta, Uvetta sultanina
lt: Sultana razinos
nl: Sultanas
sv: Sultanrussin

en: Green raisins
da: Grønne rosiner
sv: Gröna russin

en: Canned fruits
bg: Консервирани плодове
ca: Fruita en conserva
da: Frugter på dåse, Dåsefrugter, Frugt på dåse, Dåsefrugt
de: Dosenfrüchte, Fruchtkonserve, Dosenobst, Obstkonserve
es: Frutas en conserva, Conservas de frutas
fi: Purkitetut hedelmät
fr: Fruits en conserve
hr: Konzervirano voće
it: Frutta in scatola
ja: 果物の缶詰
lt: Konservuoti vaisiai
nl: Fruit in blik/pot
pt: Frutos enlatados
ru: Консервированные фрукты, Плодово-ягодные консервы
sl: Konservirano sadje
sv: Frukter på burk, Burkfrukter
tr: Konserve meyve
zh: 水果类罐头

en: Canned pineapples
bg: Консервиран ананас
da: Dåseananasser, Ananasser på dåse
de: Dosenananas
es: Piña enlatada
fi: Purkkiananakset
fr: Ananas en conserve, Ananas en boîte
hr: Konzervirani ananas
it: Ananas in scatola
ja: パイナップル缶
lt: Konservuoti ananasai
nl: Ananas in blik/pot
sl: Ananas v pločevinki
sv: Burkananaser, Ananaser på burk

en: Canned pineapple slices
da: Ananasskiver på dåse
de: Dosenananasscheibe
nl: Ananasschijfje in blik/pot
sv: Ananasskivor på burk